parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/SPANISH/FST/src/lex-modify.xfst
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# Xerox Research Center Europe - Grenoble
#
# Copyright (C)  Xerox Corporation
#
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# TYPE:		(x)fst
# CONTENT:	modifications of morphological analyzer
# LANGUAGE:	Spanish
# AUTHOR:	Anne Schiller, Elena Lopez Garcia
# CREATED:	17-Feb-2006
#
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------
# USAGE: 	fst -s morph-base.fst -l [ThisFile]
# -------------------------------------------------------------------------

define LEX 


# derivation boundary 
define DB	[ "^|" ] ; 		# derivation marker
define SB	[ "^|" | "^=" ];	# segment boundary

define SP	"^_";

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> correct some tags in the lexicon

define MAP [

# add missing category for interrogative
# e.g.		cómo+Interrog+Man		==>	cómo+Adv+Interrog+Man
#		cúyo+Interrog+Poss+Masc+Sg	==>	cúyo+Pron+Interrog+Poss+Masc+Sg
	[..]	-> %+Pron || \[%+Pron] _ %+Interrog %+Poss
.o.	[..]	-> %+Adv  || \[%+Pron] _ %+Interrog 


# correct number of "lo" 
# e.g.		el+Art+Def+Neut+SP	==> el+Art+Def+Neut+Sg

.o.	%+SP -> %+Sg	|| %+Neut _ 

# possessives
.o.   %+Pron %+Gen -> %+Det %+Poss


];

read regex MAP.i .o. LEX ;


define LEX

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> remove some readings
define REMOVE [
  {españolar} %+Verb ?*
| {paso} %+Adj ?*
| {regalo} %+Adj ?*
| {ve} %+Let ?*
| {principal} %+Noun ?*
| {haber} %+Noun ?*
| {impositiva} %+Noun ?*
| {listín} %+Adj ?*
| {Alabama} %+Prop %+Usastate %+Abrev ?*
| {dictador} %+Adj ?*
| {resoltar} %+Verb ?*
| {recuerdo} %+Adj ?*
| {envanecimiento} %+Adj ?*
| {resulta} %+Noun ?*
| {lisa} %+Noun ?*
| {cuándo} %+Conj ?*
| {cuando} %+Adv ?*
| {facer} %+Verb ?*
| {romanzar} %+Verb ?*
| {frutar} %+Verb ?*
| {pistar} %+Verb ?*
| {erar} %+Verb ?*
| {sin} SP {embargo} %+Adv ?*
| {claro}  SP {que} %+Conj ?*
| {imprimar} %+Verb ?*
| {clarar} %+Verb ?*
| {falsar} %+Verb ?*
| {culturar} %+Verb ?*
| {según} %+Adv ?*

];

read regex  ~[REMOVE] .o. LEX ;

define LEX

define COLA ${colar} .o. LEX .o. {cola} ;

read regex LEX - COLA ;

define LEX 

# ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------
echo >>> add some words

define SGPLs 	[ %+Sg:0 | %+Pl:s ];
define SGPLes 	[ %+Sg:0 | %+Pl:{es} ];

define ADJAL	[	%+Adj:0 %+MF:0 SGPLes ] ;

define ADJo 	[ o 	%+Adj:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs 
		| o:a	%+Adj:0 %+Fem:0 SGPLs 
		];


define NOUNo 	[ o 	%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs 
		| o:a	%+Noun:0 %+Fem:0 SGPLs 
		];

define VERBar	[ {ar}	%+Verb:0 %+Inf:0
		| {ar}:{o} %+Verb:0 %+PInd:0 %+1P:0 %+Sg:0  
		| {ar}:{as} %+Verb:0 %+PInd:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{a} %+Verb:0 %+PInd:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{a} %+Verb:0 %+Imp:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{amos} %+Verb:0 [ %+PInd:0 | %+Perf:0] %+1P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{áis} %+Verb:0 %+PInd:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{an} %+Verb:0 %+PInd:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{aré} %+Verb:0 %+Fut:0 %+1P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{arás} %+Verb:0 %+Fut:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{ará} %+Verb:0 %+Fut:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{aremos} %+Verb:0 %+Fut:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{aréis} %+Verb:0 %+Fut:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{arán} %+Verb:0 %+Fut:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{é} %+Verb:0 %+Perf:0 %+1P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{aste} %+Verb:0 %+Perf:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{ó} %+Verb:0 %+Perf:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{asteis} %+Verb:0 %+Perf:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{aron} %+Verb:0 %+Perf:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{aba}  %+Verb:0 %+IInd:0 [ %+1P:0| %+3P:0] %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{abas} %+Verb:0 %+IInd:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{ábamos} %+Verb:0 %+IInd:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{abais} %+Verb:0 %+IInd:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{aban} %+Verb:0 %+IInd:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{aría} %+Verb:0 %+Cond:0 [ %+1P:0| %+3P:0] %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{arías} %+Verb:0 %+Cond:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{aríamos} %+Verb:0 %+Cond:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{aríais} %+Verb:0 %+Cond:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{arían} %+Verb:0 %+Cond:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{e} %+Verb:0 %+Imp:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{e} %+Verb:0 %+PSubj:0 [ %+1P:0 | %+3P:0] %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{es} %+Verb:0 %+PSubj:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{emos} %+Verb:0 %+PSubj:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{éis} %+Verb:0 %+PSubj:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{en} %+Verb:0 [%+PSubj:0 | %+Imp:0] %+3P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{ara} %+Verb:0 %+PluPerf:0 [ %+1P:0 | %+3P:0] %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{ase} %+Verb:0 %+PluPerf:0 [ %+1P:0 | %+3P:0] %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{aras} %+Verb:0 %+PluPerf:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{ases} %+Verb:0 %+PluPerf:0 %+3P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{áramos} %+Verb:0 %+PluPerf:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{ásemos} %+Verb:0 %+PluPerf:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{arais} %+Verb:0 %+PluPerf:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{áseis} %+Verb:0 %+PluPerf:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{aran} %+Verb:0 %+PluPerf:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{asen} %+Verb:0 %+PluPerf:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{are} %+Verb:0 %+FSubj:0 [ %+1P:0 | %+3P:0] %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{ares} %+Verb:0 %+FSubj:0 %+2P:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{áremos} %+Verb:0 %+FSubj:0 %+1P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{areis} %+Verb:0 %+FSubj:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{aren} %+Verb:0 %+FSubj:0 %+3P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{ad} %+Verb:0 %+Imp:0 %+2P:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{ado} %+Verb:0 %+PastPart:0
		| {ar}:{ado} %+Verb:0 %+PastPart:0 %+Masc:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{ada} %+Verb:0 %+PastPart:0 %+Fem:0 %+Sg:0
		| {ar}:{ados} %+Verb:0 %+PastPart:0 %+Masc:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{adas} %+Verb:0 %+PastPart:0 %+Fem:0 %+Pl:0
		| {ar}:{ando} %+Verb:0 %+PresPart:0
		];
		


define ADDLEX [ 
  {calibre}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs
| {colectivo}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs
| {dislate} 		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs
| {subida}		%+Noun:0 %+Fem:0 SGPLs
| {iris} 		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+SP:0
| {jubilad} 		NOUNo
| {implicad} 		NOUNo
| {abonad}		NOUNo
| {justo} 		%+Adv:0
| {lustre}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs
| {maletín}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Sg:0
| {maletín}:{maletines}	%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Pl:0
| {nubos}		ADJo
| {otoñal}		ADJAL
| {propina} 		%+Noun:0 %+Fem:0 SGPLs
| {saharaui}		%+Adj:0 %+MF:0 SGPLs
| {tens} 		ADJo
| {listín}:{listines}	%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Pl:0
| {encuesta}		%+Noun:0 %+Fem:0 SGPLs
| {pista}		%+Noun:0 %+Fem:0 SGPLs
| {desplazad}		NOUNo
| {llegada}		%+Noun:0 %+Fem:0 SGPLs
| {soporte}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs
| {nacionalista}	%+Adj:0 %+MF:0 SGPLs
| {envanecimiento}	%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs
| {amante}		%+Adj:0 %+MF:0 SGPLs
| {amante}		%+Noun:0 %+MF:0 SGPLs
| {albanokosovar}	%+Adj:0 %+MF:0 SGPLes
| {albanokosovar}	%+Noun:0 %+MF:0 SGPLes
| {kosovar}		%+Adj:0 %+MF:0 SGPLes
| {kosovar}		%+Noun:0 %+MF:0 SGPLe
| {fragmentari}		ADJo
| {inerme}		%+Adj:0 %+MF:0 SGPLs
| {cese}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs
| {reclus} 		NOUNo
| {romance}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs
| {prim}		VERBar
| {favela}		%+Noun:0 %+Fem:0 SGPLs
| {al menos}		%+Adv:0
| {patronal}		%+Noun:0 %+Fem:0 SGPLs
| {sin embargo}		%+Conj:0
| {parche}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs
| {tóner}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs
| {tamaño}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs
| {mayúscul} 		ADJo
| {escane}		VERBar
| {hisopo}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs
| {pesad}		ADJo
| {original}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Sg:0
| {original}:{originales}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Pl:0
| {trama}		%+Noun:0 %+Fem:0 SGPLs
| {reinstal}		VERBar 
| {Piscis}		%+Noun:0 %+MF:0 %+SP:0  %+Prop:0 %+Zodiac:0
| {Escorpio}		%+Noun:0 %+MF:0 %+SP:0  %+Prop:0 %+Zodiac:0
| {fax}:{faxes}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Pl:0
| {enganche}		%+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 SGPLs
| {enmienda}		%+Noun:0 %+Fem:0 SGPLs
| {clausur}		VERBar
| {rosa}		%+Adj:0 %+MF:0 SGPLs
];


read regex ADDLEX | LEX ;
